Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2205.03
Appraiser Qualifications Board, defined.

Appraiser Qualifications Board means the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 8.